src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-luqggw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - luʼggõ: # Verb 'to read' - full paradigm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Inf: [luʼggõ, luggõ]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ger+Ine: [luʼggõs, luggõs]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup: [luʼggõm, luggõm]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ine: [luʼggõmõs, luggõmõs]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ela: [luʼggõmõst, luggõmõst]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Tra: [luʼggõmõks, luggõmõks]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Abe: [luʼggõmõt, luggõmõt]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lugūb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lugūd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugūb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [luʼggõm, luggõm]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [luʼggõt, luggõt]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [luʼggõbõd, luggõbõd]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [luʼg, lug]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: [luʼggõm, luggõm]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: [luʼggõt, luggõt]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: [luʼggõt, luggõt]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lugīz
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lugīzt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lugīz
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lugīzmõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lugīzt, lugīztõ]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lugīzt, lugīztõ]

     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: [luʼg, lug]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: [luʼggõgõm, luggõgõm]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [luʼggõgid, luggõgid]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+ConNeg: [luʼg, lug]


     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg1: [luʼggõks, luggõks]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg2: [luʼggõkst, luggõkst]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg3: [luʼggõks, luggõks]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Pl1: [luʼggõksmõ, luggõksmõ]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Pl2: [luʼggõkstõ, luggõkstõ]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Pl3: [luʼggõkstõ, luggõkstõ]
     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Jus+Sg: [luʼggõg, luggõg]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Jus+Pl: [luʼggõgõd, luggõgõd]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Quo+Sg: [luʼggiji, luggiji]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Quo+Pl: [luʼggijid, luggijid]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrsPrc+Sg: [luʼggõb, luggõb]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrsPrc+Pl: [luʼggõbõd, luggõbõd]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrfPrc+Sg: [luʼggõn, luggõn]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrfPrc+Pl: [luʼggõnd, luggõnd]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+PssPrsPrc+Sg: [luʼgdõb, lugdõb]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+PssPrsPrc+Pl: [luʼgdõbõd, lugdõbõd]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: [luʼgdõd, lugdõd]

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ger+Ine: [luʼggõs, luggõs]
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ill: [luʼggõm, luggõm]
     
     
#
     vakțõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vakț
     kittõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kit
     riʼddõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [riʼd, rid]
     kutsõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuts
     laskõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lask
     akkõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak

#luʼggõ+V+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lugdõd
     vakțõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: vakțõd
     kittõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: kittõd
     riʼddõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: [riʼdtõd, ridtõd]
     kutsõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: kutstõd
     laskõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: lastõd
     akkõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: aktõd
